Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.050

Issuance of penalty during technical assistance visit.

A regulatory agency that observes a violation during a technical assistance visit may issue a civil penalty as provided for by law if: (1) The individual or business has previously been subject to an enforcement action for the same or similar type of violation of the same statute or rule or has been given previous notice of the same or similar type of violation of the same statute or rule; or (2) the issue involves sales taxes due to the state and the individual or business is not remitting previously collected sales taxes to the state; or (3) the violation has a probability of placing a person in danger of death or bodily harm, has a probability of causing more than minor environmental harm, or has a probability of causing physical damage to the property of another in an amount exceeding one thousand dollars.

[ 1995 c 403 s 606.]